Utah statutes.
30-3-18.   Waiting period for hearing after filing for divorce -- Exemption
-- Use of counseling and education services not to be construed as condonation
or promotion.
(1)  Unless the court, for good cause shown and set forth in the findings,
otherwise orders, no hearing for decree of divorce shall be held by the court
until 90 days shall have elapsed from the filing of the complaint, provided
the court may make such interim orders as may be just and equitable.
(2)  The 90-day period as provided in Subsection (1) shall not apply in any
case where both parties have completed the mandatory educational course for
divorcing parents as provided in Section 30-3-11.3.
(3)  The use of counseling, mediation, and education services provided under
this chapter may not be construed as condoning the acts that may constitute
grounds for divorce on the part of either spouse nor of promoting divorce.
